District of Columbia statutes.
47-212

Items included in annual estimates — Expenses of Water Department.

It shall be the duty of the Mayor to include in the annual estimates of the District of Columbia estimates of the expenses of the Water Department.

History

Mar. 3, 1881, 21 Stat. 466, ch. 134, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Tax on residents and nonresidents, credits, property taxes, see § 47-1806.06.
Water supply, see § 34-2401.04 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-212.
1973 Ed., § 47-210.